California, session 20252026, AB1432.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Homelessness is a critical issue in California that affects individuals, families, and communities across the state.(b) Nonprofits play a vital role in providing services and support to individuals and families experiencing homelessness, often with funding from local and state governments.(c) To ensure the effective use of public funds and improve outcomes for people experiencing homelessness, it is essential to establish standardized performance metrics for measuring the success of homelessness programs.(d) Regular reporting of these metrics will provide transparency, enable data-driven decision making, and foster accountability among nonprofits receiving public funds for homelessness services.SEC. 2. Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 8258) is added to Division 8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read: CHAPTER 6.6. Homelessness Accountability, Recovery, and Treatment Act8258. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Homelessness Accountability, Recovery, and Treatment (HART) Act.8258.1. For purposes of this act, the following definitions apply:(a) “Local government” means a city, county, or city and county in the state.(b) “Nonprofit” means an organization that is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that receives funding from the state or local governments for programs aimed at addressing homelessness.(c) “Performance metrics” means specific, quantifiable indicators used to assess the effectiveness of homelessness programs.(d) “Recovery housing” means sober living facilities and programs that provide housing in a recovery-focused and peer-supported community for people recovering from substance use issues or receiving treatment for mental illness. Facilities and programs may require sobriety as a prerequisite for participation or be required pursuant to a court order or is a condition of release for individuals under the jurisdiction of a county probation department or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.(e) “State agency” means any California state agency or department that funds, implements, or administers a homelessness program.(f) “Homelessness program” means any program that a California state agency or department, or a local government, funds, implements, or administers for the purpose of providing emergency shelter, interim housing, housing, or housing-based services to people experiencing homelessness or at risk of homelessness.8258.2. A state agency may use up to 40% of existing noncontinuously appropriated funds allocated to a homelessness program on recovery housing that does not meet the core components of Housing First, as defined under Section 8255.8258.3. (a) (1) A nonprofit that receives state or local government funding for homelessness programs shall report to the relevant state agency or the local government from which they receive funding the following standardized performance metrics:(A) The total number of individuals and families served by the nonprofit’s homelessness programs during the reporting period.(B) The number of individuals and families placed in permanent housing during the reporting period.(C) The number of individuals and families placed in temporary housing during the reporting period.(D) The number of individuals and families who received support services, including, but not limited to, job training, mental health services, substance abuse treatment, and case management.(E) The number of individuals and families who exited homelessness and maintained stable housing for at least six months.(F) The cost per individual or family served.(G) The cost per individual or family placed in permanent housing.(2) A state agency, in consultation with local governments and stakeholders, may establish additional performance metrics as necessary to further evaluate the effectiveness of homelessness programs.(3) A state agency shall develop a standardized reporting template to be used by all nonprofits to ensure consistency and comparability of data.(4) A state agency shall compile and publish an annual report summarizing the performance metrics. The annual report shall be made publicly available on the state agency’s website and shall include an analysis of trends, outcomes, and areas for improvement in addressing homelessness.(b) The report required under subdivision (a) shall be submitted on an annual basis, with each report covering the preceding 12-month period. A state agency may adjust the reporting frequency to every other year for nonprofits that demonstrate consistent compliance and accuracy in reporting.(c) A nonprofit shall maintain records and documentation to support the performance metrics reported under subdivision (a) and shall make those records available for audit or review upon request by a local government or state agency.(d) A nonprofit that is found to have submitted inaccurate or fraudulent data may be subject to penalties, including, but not limited to, the repayment of funds, ineligibility for future funding, or other sanctions as determined by the state agency.(e) A nonprofit shall begin reporting performance metrics as required by this section beginning with the first full fiscal year following the adoption of regulations by the state agency pursuant to Section 8258.5.8258.4. (a) (1) A state agency, in collaboration with local governments, shall establish procedures for certifying the accuracy of the performance metrics reported pursuant to Section 8258.3. A local government shall cooperate fully with a state agency in establishing the procedures pursuant to this subdivision.(2) A state agency may conduct random audits of nonprofits to ensure compliance with the reporting requirements of this section and the accuracy of reported data.(b) (1) A state agency shall provide technical assistance and resources to assist nonprofits, particularly smaller nonprofit organizations, in complying with the reporting requirements of this section.(2) A state agency may allocate a portion of the funds for a homelessness program to support nonprofits in developing the capacity to collect, track, and report the required performance metrics.8258.5. A state agency shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this act no later than January 1, 2027.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 8255 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:8255.For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a)“Council” means the California Interagency Council on Homelessness, formerly known as the Homeless Coordinating and Financing Council established pursuant to Section 8257.(b)“Core components of Housing First” means all of the following:(1)Tenant screening and selection practices that promote accepting applicants regardless of their sobriety or use of substances, completion of treatment, or participation in services.(2)Applicants are not rejected on the basis of poor credit or financial history, poor or lack of rental history, criminal convictions unrelated to tenancy, or behaviors that indicate a lack of “housing readiness.”(3)Acceptance of referrals directly from shelters, street outreach, drop-in centers, and other parts of crisis response systems frequented by vulnerable people experiencing homelessness.(4)Supportive services that emphasize engagement and problem solving over therapeutic goals and service plans that are highly tenant-driven without predetermined goals.(5)Participation in services or program compliance is not a condition of permanent housing tenancy.(6)Tenants have a lease and all the rights and responsibilities of tenancy, as outlined in California’s Civil, Health and Safety, and Government codes.(7)The use of alcohol or drugs in and of itself, without other lease violations, is not a reason for eviction.(8)In communities with coordinated assessment and entry systems, incentives for funding promote tenant selection plans for supportive housing that prioritize eligible tenants based on criteria other than “first-come-first-serve,” including, but not limited to, the duration or chronicity of homelessness, vulnerability to early mortality, or high utilization of crisis services. Prioritization may include triage tools, developed through local data, to identify high-cost, high-need homeless residents.(9)Case managers and service coordinators who are trained in and actively employ evidence-based practices for client engagement, including, but not limited to, motivational interviewing and client-centered counseling.(10)Services are informed by a harm-reduction philosophy that recognizes drug and alcohol use and addiction as a part of tenants’ lives, where tenants are engaged in nonjudgmental communication regarding drug and alcohol use, and where tenants are offered education regarding how to avoid risky behaviors and engage in safer practices, as well as connected to evidence-based treatment if the tenant so chooses.(11)The project and specific apartment may include special physical features that accommodate disabilities, reduce harm, and promote health and community and independence among tenants.(c)“Homeless” has the same definition as that term is defined in Section 91.5 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(d)(1)“Housing First” means the evidence-based model that uses housing as a tool, rather than a reward, for recovery and that centers on providing or connecting homeless people to permanent housing as quickly as possible. Housing First providers offer services as needed and requested on a voluntary basis and that do not make housing contingent on participation in services.(2)(A)“Housing First” includes time-limited rental or services assistance, so long as the housing and service provider assists the recipient in accessing permanent housing and in securing longer term rental assistance, income assistance, or employment.(B)For time-limited, supportive services programs serving homeless youth, programs should use a positive youth development model and be culturally competent to serve unaccompanied youth under 25 years of age. Providers should work with the youth to engage in family reunification efforts, where appropriate and when in the best interest of the youth. In the event of an eviction, programs shall make every effort, which shall be documented, to link tenants to other stable, safe, decent housing options. Exit to homelessness should be extremely rare, and only after a tenant refuses assistance with housing search, location, and move-in assistance.(e)“State programs” means any programs a California state agency or department funds, implements, or administers for the purpose of providing emergency shelter, interim housing, housing, or housing-based services to people experiencing homelessness or at risk of homelessness, with the exception of a federally funded program with requirements inconsistent with this chapter.